Alabama, session 2026rs, SB119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) BENEFICIALLY USED. The productive and positive use
of dredged material, including fish and wildlife habitat
development, human recreation, and industrial and commercial
uses. The term does not include the deposition of dredged
material into public waters unless that deposition is part of
a shoreline restoration or marsh creation project.
(2) LIVING SHORELINE. The term as defined in Section
9-7-13.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
(3) MARSH CREATION. The deposition of dredged material
or natural or artificial material into public waters to
establish a wetland, island, or marsh habitat on that site.
(4) PUBLIC WATERS. The term as defined in Section
9-11-80, Code of Alabama 1975.
(5) SHORELINE RESTORATION. The deposition of dredged
material or natural or artificial material directly on or
adjacent to an existing shoreline to restore or preserve the
shoreline and the deposition of such material south of Dauphin
Island or south of the Fort Morgan Peninsula for the
restoration of Dauphin Island or Sand Island. This term
includes a living shoreline project.
(b) This section shall apply only in coastal areas.
(c) Any person that dredges more than one million cubic
Page 2

(c) Any person that dredges more than one million cubic
SB119 INTRODUCED
yards of material in a year shall cause at least 70 percent of
the dredged material to be beneficially used.
(d) The Alabama Department of Environmental Management
and the Alabama Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources shall adopt rules to implement this section,
including revising the Alabama Coastal Area Management Program
as necessary.
(e) A person shall not be required to comply with
subsection (c) if the Governor, by order or proclamation
declaring a state of emergency, specifically references this
section and states that this section shall not be in effect.
Such an order or proclamation shall provide a date on which
the order shall be terminated and no longer in effect.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3